Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3618.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 1353, as
last amended by Section 4, Chapter 441, O.S.L. 2024 (68 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 1353), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1353. Purpose of article - Apportionment of revenues.
A. It is hereby declared to be the purpose of the Oklahoma
Sales Tax Code to provide funds for the financing of the program
provided for by the Oklahoma Social Security Act and to provide
revenues for the support of the functions of the state government of
Oklahoma, and for this purpose it is hereby expressly provided that,
Req. No. 14024 Page 1

reve nues derived pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Sales
Tax Code, subject to the apportionment requirements for the Oklahoma
Tax Commission and Office of Management and Enterprise Services
Joint Computer Enhancement Fund provided by Section 265 of this
title, and further subject to the apportionment requirement provided
in subsection D of this section, shall be apportioned as follows:
1. Except as provided in subsection C of this section, the
following amounts shall be paid to the State Treasurer to be placed
to the credit of the General Revenue Fund to be paid out pursuant to
direct appropriation by the Legislature:
Fiscal Year Amount
FY 2003 and FY 2004 86.04%
FY 2005 85.83%
FY 2006 85.54%
FY 2007 85.04%
FY 2008 through FY 2022 83.61%
FY 2023 through FY 2027 83.36%
FY 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter 83.61%;
2. The following amounts shall be paid to the State Treasurer
to be placed to the credit of the Education Reform Revolving Fund of
the State Department of Education:
a. for FY 2003, FY 2004 and FY 2005, ten and forty-two
one-hundredths percent (10.42%),

Req. No. 14024 Page 2

b. for FY 2006 through FY 2020, ten and forty-six one-
hundredths percent (10.46%),
c. for FY 2021:
(1) for the month beginning July 1, 2020, through the
month ending August 31, 2020, ten and forty-six
one-hundredths percent (10.46%), and
(2) for the month beginning September 1, 2020,
through the month ending June 30, 2021, eleven
and ninety-six one-hundredths percent (11.96%),
d. for FY 2022 and each fiscal year thereafter, ten and
forty-six one-hundredths percent (10.46%);
3. The following amounts shall be paid to the State Treasurer
to be placed to the credit of the Teachers' Retirement System
Dedicated Revenue Revolving Fund:
Fiscal Year Amount
FY 2003 and FY 2004 3.54%
FY 2005 3.75%
FY 2006 4.0%
FY 2007 4.5%
FY 2008 through FY 2020 5.0%
FY 2021:
a. for the month beginning July
1, 2020, through the month
ending August 31, 2020 5.0%
Req. No. 14024 Page 3

b. for the month beginning
September 1, 2020, through
the month ending June 30,
2021 3.5%
FY 2022 5.0%
FY 2023 through FY 2027 5.25%
FY 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter 5.0%;
4. a. except as otherwise provided in subparagraph b of this
paragraph, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2022
2026, and for each fiscal year thereafter, eighty-
seven one-hundredths percent (0.87%) shall be paid to
the State Treasurer to be further apportioned as
follows:
(1) twenty-four percent (24%) shall be placed to the
credit of the Oklahoma Tourism Promotion
Revolving Fund, but in no event shall such
apportionment exceed Five Million Dollars
($5,000,000.00) Ten Million Dollars
$10,000,000.00) in any fiscal year,
(2) forty-four percent (44%) shall be placed to the
credit of the Oklahoma Tourism Capital
Improvement Revolving Fund, but in no event shall
such apportionment exceed Nine Million Dollars

Req. No. 14024 Page 4

($9,000,000.00) Seventeen Million Dollars
($17,000,000.00) in any fiscal year, and
(3) thirty-two percent (32%) shall be placed to the
credit of the Oklahoma Route 66 Commission
Revolving Fund, but in no event shall such
apportionment exceed Six Million Six Hundred
Thousand Dollars ($6,600,000.00) in any fiscal
year, and
b. any amounts which exceed the limitations of
subparagraph a of this paragraph shall be placed to
the credit of the General Revenue Fund; and
5. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2015, and for each
fiscal year thereafter, six one-hundredths percent (0.06%) shall be
placed to the credit of the Oklahoma Historical Society Capital
Improvement and Operations Revolving Fund, but in no event shall
such apportionment exceed the total amount apportioned pursuant to
this paragraph for the fiscal year ending on June 30, 2015. Any
amounts which exceed the limitations of this paragraph shall be
placed to the credit of the General Revenue Fund.
B. Provided, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2007, and
every fiscal year thereafter, an amount of revenue shall be
apportioned to each municipality or county which levies a sales tax
subject to the provisions of Section 1357.10 of this title and
subsection F of Section 2701 of this title equal to the amount of
Req. No. 14024 Page 5

sale s tax revenue of such municipality or county exempted by the
provisions of Section 1357.10 of this title and subsection F of
Section 2701 of this title. The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall
promulgate and adopt rules necessary to implement the provisions of
this subsection.
C. From the monies that would otherwise be apportioned to the
General Revenue Fund pursuant to subsection A of this section, there
shall be apportioned the following amounts:
1. For the month ending August 31, 2019:
a. Nine Million Six Hundred Thousand Dollars
($9,600,000.00) to the credit of the State Highway
Construction and Maintenance Fund created in Section
1501 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and
b. Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) to the credit of
the Oklahoma Railroad Maintenance Revolving Fund
created in Section 309 of Title 66 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
2. For the month ending September 30, 2019:
a. Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00) to the credit
of the State Highway Construction and Maintenance Fund
created in Section 1501 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, and
b. Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) to the credit of
the Oklahoma Railroad Maintenance Revolving Fund
Req. No. 14024 Page 6

created in Section 309 of Title 66 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
3. For the month ending October 31, 2019:
a. Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00) to the credit
of the State Highway Construction and Maintenance Fund
created in Section 1501 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, and
b. Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) to the credit of
the Oklahoma Railroad Maintenance Revolving Fund
created in Section 309 of Title 66 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
4. For the month ending November 30, 2019:
a. Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00) to the credit
of the State Highway Construction and Maintenance Fund
created in Section 1501 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, and
b. Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) to the credit of
the Oklahoma Railroad Maintenance Revolving Fund
created in Section 309 of Title 66 of the Oklahoma
Statutes; and
5. For the month ending December 31, 2019:
a. Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00) to the credit
of the State Highway Construction and Maintenance Fund

Req. No. 14024 Page 7

created in Section 1501 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, and
b. Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) to the credit of
the Oklahoma Railroad Maintenance Revolving Fund
created in Section 309 of Title 66 of the Oklahoma
Statutes.
D. For fiscal year 2029, and each subsequent fiscal year, Fifty
Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00) shall be placed to the credit of
the Oklahoma Capital Assets Maintenance and Protection Fund created
in Section 2 188B of this act Title 73 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 50011, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 50011. As used in the Oklahoma Tourism Promotion Act:
1. "Committee" means the Oklahoma Tourism Promotion Advisory
Committee;
2. "Department" means the Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation
Department; and
3. "Tourism promotion" or "promote Oklahoma tourism" means and
is limited to:
a. the cost of producing advertisements and other
promotional content for the state, placement of those
the content and advertisements with the media
(newspapers, magazines, radio, television, billboard,
direct mail, social media, and the Internet) and the
Req. No. 14024 Page 8

production and printing of collateral materials
designed specifically to support and fulfill
information requests generated by the media
advertising campaigns, and the production, printing
and distribution of brochures and promotions other
promotional items for regional, national and
international tourism conferences. Tourism promotion
shall also include the cost of attending,
participating in, hosting tourism conferences,
festivals, sites and events concerning ethnic history
and ethnic events which have occurred or are occurring
in this state. For purposes of this paragraph,
"ethnic" means of or relating to races or large groups
of people classed according to common traits or
customs which attract or promote tourism in Oklahoma.
Tourism promotion shall also include the cost of data
collection and other analytics to evaluate the
effectiveness of tourism promotion efforts, and
b. the cost of providing a computerized consumer-oriented
traveler response information program. Such program
shall include a comprehensive state data base
containing up-to-date information on state travel
attractions and facilities, including but not limited
to, lodging facilities, restaurants, chambers of
Req. No. 14024 Page 9

commerce, convention and visitors bureaus, golf
courses, campgrounds, events, regional tourism
organizations and all other attractions. Oklahoma
travel attractions and facilities shall be included on
such data base free of charge.
"Tourism promotion" and "promote Oklahoma tourism" shall not
include expenses for travel or lodging, except for those incurred in
attending and participating in tourism conferences.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-14024 TKR 12/30/25









Req. No. 14024 Page 10